Utah statutes.
34-38-8.   Employer's disciplinary or rehabilitative actions.
Upon receipt of a verified or confirmed positive drug or alcohol test result
which indicates a violation of the employer's written policy, or upon the
refusal of an employee or prospective employee to provide a sample, an
employer may use that test result or refusal as the basis for disciplinary or
rehabilitative actions, which may include the following:
(1)  a requirement that the employee enroll in an employer-approved
rehabilitation, treatment, or counseling program, which may include additional
drug or alcohol testing, as a condition of continued employment;
(2)  suspension of the employee with or without pay for a period of time;
(3)  termination of employment;
(4)  refusal to hire a prospective employee; or
(5)  other disciplinary measures in conformance with the employer's usual
procedures, including any collective bargaining agreement.
